Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 303, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 303. A. Prior to the adoption of any rule or amendment
or revocation of a rule and except as provided for pursuant to the
expedited rule repeal process provided in Section 9 of this act, the
agency shall:

1. Cause notice of any intended action to be published in “The
Oklahoma Register” pursuant to subsection B of this section;
2. For at least thirty (30) days after publication of the
notice of the intended rulemaking action, afford a comment period
for all interested persons to submit data, views, or arguments,
orally or in writing. The agency shall consider fully all written
and oral submissions respecting the proposed rule;
3. Hold a hearing, if required, as provided by subsection C of
this section;
4. Consider the effect its intended action may have on the
various types of business and governmental entities. Except where
such modification or variance is prohibited by statute or
constitutional constraints, if an agency finds that its actions may
adversely affect any such entity, the agency may modify its actions
to exclude that type of entity, or may “tier” its actions to allow
rules, penalties, fines, or reporting procedures and forms to vary
according to the size of a business or governmental entity or its
ability to comply or both. For business entities, the agency shall
include a description of the probable quantitative and qualitative
impact of the proposed rule, economic or otherwise, and use
quantifiable data to the extent possible, taking into account both
short-term and long-term consequences;
5. Consider the effect its intended action may have on the
various types of consumer groups. If an agency finds that its
actions may adversely affect such groups, the agency may modify its
actions to exclude that type of activity; and
6. When an agency provides notice pursuant to paragraph 1 of
this subsection, the agency shall provide one (1) electronic copy of
the complete text of the proposed rule, amendment, or revocation and
a copy of the notice to the Governor and to the appropriate cabinet
secretary. No agency may shall adopt any proposed rule, amendment,
or revocation if unless, within thirty (30) days from providing
notice to the Governor and the appropriate cabinet secretary, the
agency receives express written disapproval approval from the
Governor or the cabinet secretary. If the Governor or the cabinet
secretary disapproves a rule, the affected agency shall be notified
in writing of the reasons for disapproval. If, after thirty (30)
ENR. S. B. NO. 1024 Page 2

days of providing the notice to the Governor and the cabinet
secretary, the agency has not received an express written
disapproval approval, the agency may shall not proceed with the
rulemaking process.
B. The notice required by paragraph 1 of subsection A of this
section shall include, but not be limited to:
1. In simple language, a brief summary of the rule;
2. The proposed action being taken;
3. The circumstances which created the need for the rule;
4. The specific legal authority, including statutory citations,
authorizing the proposed rule;
5. The intended effect of the rule;
6. If the agency determines that the rule affects business
entities, a request that such entities provide the agency, within
the comment period, in dollar amounts if possible, the increase in
the level of direct costs such as fees, and indirect costs such as
reporting, recordkeeping, equipment, construction, labor,
professional services, revenue loss, or other costs expected to be
incurred by a particular entity due to compliance with the proposed
rule;
7. The time when, the place where, and the manner in which
interested persons may present their views thereon pursuant to
paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section;
8. Whether or not the agency intends to issue a rule impact
statement according to subsection D of this section and where copies
of such impact statement may be obtained for review by the public;
9. The time when, the place where, and the manner in which
persons may demand a hearing on the proposed rule if the notice does
not already provide for a hearing. If the notice provides for a
hearing, the time and place of the hearing shall be specified in the
notice; and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1024 Page 3

10. Where copies of the proposed rules may be obtained for
review by the public. An agency may charge persons for the actual
cost of mailing a copy of the proposed rules to such persons.
The number of copies of such notice as specified by the
Secretary of State shall be submitted to the Secretary of State who
shall publish the notice in “The Oklahoma Register” pursuant to the
provisions of Section 255 of this title.
Prior to or within three (3) days after publication of the
notice in “The Oklahoma Register”, the agency shall cause a copy of
the notice of the proposed rule adoption and the rule impact
statement, if available, to be mailed to all persons who have made a
timely request of the agency for advance notice of its rulemaking
proceedings. Provided, in lieu of mailing copies, an agency may
electronically notify interested persons that a copy of the proposed
rule and the rule impact statement, if available, may be viewed on
the agency’s website. If an agency posts a copy of the proposed
rule and rule impact statement on its website, the agency shall not
charge persons for the cost of downloading or printing the proposed
rule or impact statement. Each agency shall maintain a listing of
persons or entities requesting such notice.
C. 1. If the published notice does not already provide for a
hearing, an agency shall schedule a hearing on a proposed rule if,
within thirty (30) days after the published notice of the proposed
rule adoption, a written request for a hearing is submitted by:
a. at least ten persons,
b. a political subdivision,
c. an agency, or
d. an association having not less than twenty-five
members.
At that hearing persons may present oral argument, data, and
views on the proposed rule.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1024 Page 4

2. A hearing on a proposed rule may not be held earlier than
thirty (30) days after notice of the hearing is published pursuant
to subsection B of this section.
3. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to
prevent an agency from holding a hearing or hearings on the proposed
rule although not required by the provisions of this subsection;
provided, that notice of such hearing shall be published in “The
Oklahoma Register” at least thirty (30) days prior to such hearing.
D. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
agency shall issue a rule impact statement of a proposed rule prior
to or within fifteen (15) days after the date of publication of the
notice of proposed rule adoption. The rule impact statement may be
modified after any hearing or comment period afforded pursuant to
the provisions of this section.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the rule
impact statement shall include, but not be limited to:
a. a brief description of the purpose of the proposed
rule,
b. a description of the classes of persons who most
likely will be affected by the proposed rule,
including classes that will bear the costs of the
proposed rule, and any information on cost impacts
received by the agency from any private or public
entities,
c. a description of the classes of persons who will
benefit from the proposed rule,
d. a description of the probable economic impact of the
proposed rule upon affected classes of persons or
political subdivisions, including a listing of all fee
changes and, whenever possible, a separate
justification for each fee change,
e. the probable costs and benefits to the agency and to
any other agency of the implementation and enforcement
of the proposed rule, the source of revenue to be used
ENR. S. B. NO. 1024 Page 5

for implementation and enforcement of the proposed
rule, and any anticipated effect on state revenues,
including a projected net loss or gain in such
revenues if it can be projected by the agency,
f. a determination of whether implementation of the
proposed rule will have an economic impact on any
political subdivisions or require their cooperation in
implementing or enforcing the rule,
g. a determination of whether implementation of the
proposed rule may have an adverse economic effect on
small business as provided by the Oklahoma Small
Business Regulatory Flexibility Act,
h. an explanation of the measures the agency has taken to
minimize compliance costs and a determination of
whether there are less costly or nonregulatory methods
or less intrusive methods for achieving the purpose of
the proposed rule,
i. a determination of the effect of the proposed rule on
the public health, safety, and environment and, if the
proposed rule is designed to reduce significant risks
to the public health, safety, and environment, an
explanation of the nature of the risk and to what
extent the proposed rule will reduce the risk,
j. a determination of any detrimental effect on the
public health, safety, and environment if the proposed
rule is not implemented, and
k. the date the rule impact statement was prepared and if
modified, the date modified;
l. an analysis of alternatives to adopting the rule;
m. estimates of the amount of time that would be spent by
state employees to develop the rule and of the amount
of other resources that would be utilized to develop
the rule; and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1024 Page 6

n. a summary and preliminary comparison of any existing
or proposed federal regulations that are intended to
address the activities to be regulated by the proposed
rule.
3. To the extent an agency for good cause finds the preparation
of a rule impact statement or the specified contents thereof are
unnecessary or contrary to the public interest in the process of
adopting a particular rule, the agency may request the Governor to
waive such requirement. Such request shall be in writing and shall
state the agency’s findings and the justification for such findings.
Upon request by an agency, the Governor may also waive the rule
impact statement requirements if the agency is required to implement
a statute or federal requirement that does not require an agency to
interpret or describe the requirements, such as federally mandated
provisions which afford the agency no discretion to consider less
restrictive alternatives. If the Governor fails to waive such
requirement, in writing, prior to publication of the notice of the
intended rulemaking action, the rule impact statement shall be
completed. The determination to waive the rule impact statement
shall not be subject to judicial review.
4. The rule shall not be invalidated on the ground grounds that
the contents of the rule impact statement are insufficient or
inaccurate.
E. Upon completing the requirements of this section, an agency
may adopt a proposed rule. No rule is valid unless adopted in
substantial compliance with the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1024 Page 7

Passed the Senate the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1024 Page 8